Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.140

Penalty for unlicensed acts.

It shall be unlawful and constitute a gross misdemeanor for any person to act or serve in the capacity of a nursing home administrator unless he or she is the holder of a nursing home administrator's license issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That persons carrying out functions and duties delegated by a licensed administrator as defined in RCW 18.52.030 shall not be construed to be committing any unlawful act under this chapter.

[ 1992 c 53 s 10; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 14.]